 How to Transfer Ownership After a Limited Liability Company's Termination | LegalZoom Legal Info      Skip to main content.    My Account | Check Order Status | Contact Us | Our Satisfaction Guarantee    Speak to a Customer Care Specialist:  (888)552-4921                            Forming Your Business LLC (Limited Liability Company) Incorporation (S-Corp, C-Corp) Nonprofit Sole Proprietorship General Partnership LP (Limited Partnership) LLP (Limited Liability Partnership) Compare S-Corp, C-Corp, LLC Not sure which one is right for you? Get help   Naming Your Business DBA / Business Names Entity Name Availability Check Entity Name Reservation Trademark Search Trademark a Business Name Tax, Licenses and Permits Federal Tax ID (EIN) State Tax ID 501(c)(3) Application S-Corp Election Business Licenses Seller's Permit   Additional Business Services Corporate Supplies Certified Copies Certificates of Good Standing Registered Agent Services Legal Forms and Agreements Franchise Disclosure Doc Review PRO Legal Doc Review - 11–25 pages PRO TM Office Action Response PRO Website Terms & Conditions PRO Business Legal Plan      Corporate Changes and Filings Corporate Amendments Dissolution Foreign Qualification Corporate Name Change Conversion S-Corp Election DBA / Fictitious Business Name Real Estate Real Estate Lease Real Estate Deed Transfer Other Real Estate Documents   Trademarks Trademark Registration Trademark Search Trademark Monitoring Trademark Statement of Use International Trademark Filing Other Trademark Filings Patents and Copyrights Patents Provisional Application for Patent Patent Search Utility Patent (Step I) Design Patent Copyright Registration Help Me Compare   Business Compliance Annual Reports Initial Reports Corporate Minutes Compliance Calendar Registered Agent Services Operating Agreements Bylaws & Resolutions Additional Business Services Corporate Supplies Certified Copies Certificates of Good Standing Immigration Legal Forms and Agreements Franchise Disclosure Doc Review PRO Legal Doc Review - 11–25 pages PRO TM Office Action Response PRO Website Terms & Conditions PRO Business Legal Plan      Wills & Trusts Last Will and Testament Living Trust Living Will (Advance Directive) Power of Attorney (Financial) Health Care Power of Attorney Pet Protection Agreement Help me Compare   Additional Services Real Estate Deed Transfer Personal Legal Plan      Personal Services Bankruptcy Divorce Immigration Personal Injury Name Change Prenuptial Agreements Power of Attorney (Financial) Health Care Power of Attorney Pet Protection Agreement Disability Benefits DUI / DWI   Real Estate Real Estate Lease Real Estate Deed Transfer Other Real Estate Documents Additional Services Legal Forms and Agreements Copyright Legal Doc Review - 11–25 pages PRO Personal Legal Plan      Need Help?   » Speak to an Attorney » Customer Care        Need Help?   » Speak to an Attorney » Customer Care            How to Transfer Ownership After a Limited Liability Company's Termination  by Marie Murdock       An LLC may wind up its business affairs after dissolution. Jupiterimages/BananaStock/Getty Images   Related Articles  How do I Transfer a Title of Property From a Person to an LLC? How to Re-Open a Dissolved Company What Happens to a Shareholder in a Dissolved Corporation?    Under most state laws, an LLC will have a winding-up period after dissolution or termination during which it will be allowed to continue to deed real property and convey personal property out of its company name. The winding-up period may not be set in stone, often referred to as a “reasonable” period of time. The LLC should make every effort, however, to distribute property out of the company name in a timely manner following a voluntary dissolution.   Ready to start your LLC? Start an LLC Online Now     Step 1Deed real property out of the LLC to third-party buyers in the same manner as if the LLC were still in existence. Many attorneys will prepare the deed to state that the property is being conveyed to wind up the business of the LLC, since the conveyance is taking place after the date of the dissolution. Upon the conveyance to the third-party purchaser, distribute the proceeds from the sale to the members according to their percentage ownership in the LLC at the time of its dissolution. A prior written operating agreement or verbal arrangement should determine this percentage.   Step 2Deed real property from the LLC directly to the individual members according to their percentage ownership interest in the LLC. This process allows the LLC to convey the property out of the company name even without a third party seeking to buy the property at the time of dissolution. In the unfortunate event one of the members were to die prior to the sale, his percentage may have to be either deeded to his rightful heirs or devisees, or the remaining members will have to buy the deceased member’s interest from his heirs or devisees. This situation may have been addressed in the company operating agreement.   Step 3Convey personal property or titled property, such as a vehicle, by bill of sale and/or by signing over any existing title to the new owner. Have the authorized signatory, which may be all the members or a company-appointed manager, sign all necessary documents. Proceeds from the sale should be disbursed according to the company operating agreement or an oral agreement, as applicable.    Ready to start your LLC? Start an LLC Online Now   Tips & Warnings       Contact a corporate attorney to assist with complex issues involving dissolution.        Any liens against property or creditor claims may have to be paid prior to deeding any property out of the LLC.        In the event of a judicial or court-ordered dissolution, a receiver may have to be appointed to manage the property of the dissolved LLC.       References      Washington State Legislature: House Bill Report HB 2657     Onecle: Code of Alabama -- Title 10: Corporations, Partnerships and Associations -- Section 10-12-39     Onecle: Texas Business Organizations Code -- Section 11.052. Winding Up Procedures     TheLLCExpert.com: LLC Dissolution Terminating a Limited Liability Company     Attorneys Title: Corporations and Limited Liability Companies -- Dissolution and Suspension     Keytlaw: What You Need to Know Before Dissolving an Arizona Limited Liability Company       Resources      LLC Operating Agreements: What Happens When an LLC Member Dies      About the Author Marie Murdock has been employed in the legal and title insurance industries for over 25 years. Murdock was first published in print in 1979 and has been writing online articles since mid-2010. Her articles have appeared on LegalZoom and various other websites.   Photo Credits  Jupiterimages/BananaStock/Getty Images      Next Article: How do I Transfer a Title of Property From a Person to an LLC?    This article was created by and is owned by Leaf Group Ltd., its subsidiaries, affiliates, or contractors ("Leaf Group Ltd.") and do not necessarily reflect the views or opinions of LegalZoom. Nothing stated or implied in this article should be construed to be legal, tax, or professional advice. Leaf Group Ltd. is not a law firm and this article should not be interpreted as creating an attorney-client or legal advisor relationship. For questions regarding your specific situation, please consult a qualified attorney. LegalZoom is not a law firm and can only provide self-help services at your specific direction.         More Articles  How to Transfer a Deed to an LLC Why Dissolve a Limited Liability Company How to Reactivate a Dissolved LLC How to Divide an LLC Florida Laws for Setting Up an LLC As a Subsidiary    LLC Information  File an LLC LLC Price Quick LLC Application LegalZoom LLC    We Recommend  How to Close an LLC Can I Use a Bank Account After Dissolving an LLC? Dissolving an LLC in Florida Ohio Limited Liability Company Act How to Set Up a Division in an LLC Laws About Closing a C Corporation in Ohio How to Collect a Judgment in Michigan if an LLC Is out of Business? What Happens to Debt When You Dissolve an LLC? Connecticut Wills & Estate Law How to Dissolve an LLC in Nevada How to Dissolve an LLC in Delaware State of Delaware Requirements for LLC              


Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft











The Best VoIP & Virtual PBX Phone Systems in New Hanover County | Low Cost Business Phone Systems in New Hanover County, NC
























The Best Business Phone Systems in New Hanover County, NC
Enter Your Zip Code for Pricing





GO







GO




















Robust, Scalable Business Phone Systems in New Hanover County, NC
As telecom technology continues to evolve, deciding which business phone system in New Hanover County are best for your office is an ongoing challenge for IT departments. Whether you need a large corporate integration or a small business telephone system in New Hanover County, Aptera helps you integrate them seamlessly into your myriad of systems and workflow. Starting with a basic understanding of PBX, VoIP systems and other available options will help you make a decision that meets the ever changing telecommunication needs of your business.






Enter Your Zip Code for Pricing





GO







GO









Selecting VoIP Business Phone Systems in Wilmington, Carolina Beach and Castle Hayne
VoIP (Voice over Internet Protocol) phone systems that transmit, forward and route phone calls over the Internet have changed telephony forever. Aptera partners walk you through every step setting up your VoIp phone system in Wilmington, Carolina Beach, Castle Hayne and Wrightsville Beach from choosing features, installation and training. These cloud bases virtual PBX systems in New Hanover County are often the first choice for new and small businesses because of flexibility in features, increased reliability, and lower setup costs.

Cloud Based VoIP/Virtual PBX Systems
Cloud based VoIP or virtual PBX (private branch exchange) business phone systems are hosted on a secure, shared, off-site data center. This allows non-tech employees to set up and use the virtual software platform to make or receive phone calls in the office, at remote locations, and even at home. Virtual PBX technology means less IT troubleshooting on the user side, a multitude of available features, and no requirements to spend money on hardware installations or upgrades. You buy the business phones, pay for monthly service, add SIP Trunks as necessary, that's it. The knock against full VoIP systems in Wilmington, Carolina Beach and Castle Hayne has been reliability because if there is a localized Internet outage you temporarily lose all service.
Locally Hosted PBX
Locally hosted, or premise based traditional PBX is installed, managed, and maintained at the business site—usually in a server closet with other hardware. While the functions are very similar to cloud based systems, it should be noted that all features are provided by the installed equipment at your location. You get more control with a PBX system installation in Wilmington, Carolina Beach, Castle Hayne and Wrightsville Beach but upgrades can be costly as new equipment must be purchased, installed, and configured by someone on your staff. Run through traditional copper wiring and switches to handle transfers, extensions, and directories, they offer maximum reliability. VoIP systems are gaining in dependability as technology continues to advance. The tide is turning against traditional PBX networked office phone systems in New Hanover County as the expense to set up and maintain the infrastructure is too great and cloud based options for SIP trunking with a web interface are increasingly reliable.

The Big Picture
It can be easy to lose sight of the ultimate goal when reviewing features, weighing the requests of internal departments, and looking at up-time charts. Your head may start to spin as you evaluate business phones from Panasonic, Nortel, NEC and dozens of other brands. Just keep in mind that reliable service, valuable features, and an affordable plan are important and one size does not fit all:

Small Business Phone Systems in New Hanover County (5 to 100 Users)
Medium and small businesses are best using either land line phone systems or cloud based VoIP services. Landlines offer the basic features such as voicemail, caller ID, and even call transfer without adding hardware to older systems. As you grow and need advanced features such as an auto-attendant you may want to make the jump to cloud based VoIP services.
Large Corporate Systems (Over 100 Users)
Larger businesses with an on-staff IT department can consider a locally hosted PBX system, as they already have the personnel in place to set up and maintain the system. Only with this economy of scale can businesses justify the investment in both equipment and manpower.
High Volume Call Center Telephone Systems
A VoIP system with virtual PBX is typically the best option for call centers fielding over 500 calls per day. Features available with a virtual PBX system such as call distribution, hierarchy routing, overflow queues, and real-time monitoring allow the call center to run smoothly.
Multi-Location Phone Systems in New Hanover County, NC
Cloud based VoIP can handle your multi-location business with ease and allows you to use one interface to manage and control your call details. If you have locations 5 locations across Wilmington, Carolina Beach, Castle Hayne, Wrightsville Beach and Kure Beach, a business phone system that isn't reliant on IT staff in Wilmington makes the most sense. No centralized IT department needed and your security department can still monitor all data remotely.
Phone Systems For Remote & Mobile Workforce
Utilize a VoIP system for remote workers with complete virtual office functionality. Employees can integrate existing mobile phones to take or transfer calls in a remote location and change routing on the fly.

Overwhelming Feature Options
When IT managers are trying to upgrade their office phone system in Wilmington, Carolina Beach and Castle Hayne it is easy for 'feature bloat' to grind the process to a halt. There are an immense number of valuable features to choose from but your primary decision maker for telephone systems must be able to decide which feature are necessary, which add some value, and which are just useless bells and whistles.

Auto-Attendant - Greets callers, manages call-routing, and can even inform callers of important information (such as hours, closings, special announcements) via various prompts.
Call Queue - Gives the caller the ability to choose to be routed to voicemail, hold for the desired employee to answer, or return to the main menu.
Conference - Phone conferencing options benefit the business and the client when all parties are unable to be in one place for an important meeting.
Dial by Name/Extension
Music on Hold - Integrate your company slogan or relay information about company operations while a caller waits for the party they are trying to reach.
Mode Scheduling - Route phone calls based on the season, month, day of week, or even the hour of the day. Mode scheduling directs callers to indicated prompts based on the pre-set availability of employees.
Voicemail - Fully customizable, combine office and cell messages, give email alerts, transfer voice to text, and forward messages to other lines when needed.
Call Reporting - This feature lets administrators view the time, duration, and other specific details of any call made or received.
Call Forwarding
Find Me - Like call forwarding, transfers calls to another line when the first line does not answer—but can also be optimized to ring additional lines until the call is picked up.
Call Parking - Lets you place a call on hold and pick it up from a different phone at your location.
Remote Managing - Allows you to manage your business phone system from a laptop, desktop, or mobile device while you are off-site.
Anywhere Connectivity - This feature lets you add any land line, VoIP, or mobile phone—no matter the location.
Caller ID
Advanced Routing via Caller ID
Designated Privileges - Ability to authorize specific lines for long-distance calling. Also allows you to block certain types of outgoing calls.
Do Not Disturb - Set the line to automatically route calls to voicemail while you are in an important meeting.
Call Monitoring - Listen in on your company calls for maximum quality assurance.
Video Conferencing - Chat with coworkers or clients face-to-face for a more personalized level of service.
Nationwide Phone Numbers - Choose phone numbers for New Hanover County extensions based on where where your customers are.

Meeting Minimum Requirements For Connectivity
Modern high tech office communications systems that combine faxes, video conferencing, data flow management, landlines and cell phones are data intensive . If your building is still wired with old copper wire you will need to upgrade to a fiber optic line to meet these demands. Corporate sized telecommunication systems need WAN (wide area network) for higher speed connectivity between multiple office over large distances. Requirements include at least a T1 line at each location and CAT 5 (category 5 twisted pair) connections for up to 1000 MHz. Fiber optic networks can connect directly into your business phone system in New Hanover County circumventing the need for traditional landlines in new buildings. For very large offices with high data demands where a T1 might not cut it you may need a stronger connection to the internet backbone with OC48 (Optical Carrier Level) up to 2.5 Gigabits/second or OC192 up to 10 Gigabits/second.
Beyond the Features

System Training
Find out how much training is offered by the New Hanover County telecommunications contractor? Also find the average time it takes to set each employee up.
Tech Support
If your phones ever go down you need a tech support team with a quick response time. Ask how technical issues are handled and prioritized and what average response times for problems such as noise on the line or non-working extensions.
Reliability
For most companies, when their telephone system crashes they start losing money immediately. Ask for documented up-time averages for other business similar in size to your own prior to deciding. If they cannot guarantee near 100% up-time then find another system.
Keep Costs in Check
What will a phone system cost in New Hanover County for my sized business? This is a major factor when ultimately selecting a system but quick, cookie cutter pricing rarely reflects the final price you pay. Considering upfront installation and equipment costs versus lifetime costs when comparing bids is critical but not always easy. Does money need to be spent on wiring and infrastructure? Are there software setup fees? Who owns the phones? Most New Hanover County telephone system prices are highly custom and contractors swap similar telecom jargon so make sure everything is clear and itemized on every bid.
Scalability
To make sure you can handle future growth - both employee count and data flow - keep platform scalability in mind during the discovery phase. Your telephone system must accommodate new technology such as video conferencing, live chat customer service functions and anything else your operations department throws at you. Also what happens if you need to downsize, are you contractually obligated to keep paying for a certain number of lines? In general, VoIP systems in New Hanover County are the most flexible and you can typically add or remove users in seconds on your web interface.

Questions to Ask of Your Business Phone System Provider

Can I keep my current phone number?
Yes, number portability is recognized nationwide from all carriers.
My customers are out of state—can I use a different area code?
Yes, nearly all VOIP service providers in New Hanover County offer the ability to choose a number from any US area code.
How is the training conducted?
Most small business phone system companies in New Hanover County offer a combination of training over the phone, video tutorials or online training. Larger companies with more complex telephone systems with long lead times for installation usually include on site training for the in-house tech department (for integration into Salesforce or other external systems) and for regular employees just before launch.
Do you belong to any associations?
In general a phone system contractor who belongs to associations hold themselves to a higher standard and make their track record more public. If they belong to USTelecom for example that should be a step towards earning your trust.
Do I purchase or lease the phone equipment?
Whether you lease or buy business phones in New Hanover County will depend on the type of system and provider you choose. Most telecom companies lease the equipment to you and provide upgrades periodically to ensure you have the latest technology.
What if my system goes down?
Many providers have a back-up plan in place to allow calls to be re-routed until tech support can resolve the issue.
Is line maintenance included in my plan?
Some, but not all, providers include line maintenance.

Keeping Your Phone System Secure
Thousands of customer details, credit card numbers, and other secure data pass through phone systems in Wilmington, Carolina Beach, Castle Hayne and Wrightsville Beach every single day. Security always needs to be a top concern with hacking, toll fraud, and eavesdropping all commonplace and known weaknesses in IP phone system security. Secure phone systems employ firewall technology, signaling and device encryption, and password-coded user features.
Additionally, remember to always:

Keep software up-to-date
Remind employees to delete sensitive voicemail information
Change passwords regularly
Report suspected cases of fraud to your provider immediately

The NIST www.csrc.nist.gov and GSA www.gsa.gov also offer guidance for implementing corporate standards that protect your company and your clients.
 


New Hanover County Cities Served 




											Wilmington Business Phone Systems					




Business Phone Systems Wilmington, NC

It Management & Consulting Llc2508 Independence Blvd, Ste 204Wilmington, NC 28412

Accu-call Answering Service2392 Carolina Blvd, # Site 204Wilmington, NC 28409

Teleco5221 Oleander DrWilmington, NC 28403

Mc Carter Electrical Co5744 Marguerite DrWilmington, NC 28403

Alternate Phone Systems5007 Wrightsville AveWilmington, NC 28403

Sound & Telephone Systems1501 Marstellar StWilmington, NC 28401

Century Link3205 Randall PkwyWilmington, NC 28403

Speros2410 Skidaway RdWilmington, NC 28401

Multi-comm Systems406 N Kerr AveWilmington, NC 28405

Accutel Business Phone Systems5940 Market StWilmington, NC 28405

Edens Telecom Inc5940 Market StWilmington, NC 28405

Divergintz Data Vox Solutionz311 Judges Rd, Ste 6aWilmington, NC 28405

Interconnect Products & Service311 Judges Rd, Ste 3cWilmington, NC 28405

Embarq Communications2940 Orville Wright WayWilmington, NC 28405 Wilmington Business Phone Systems Costs:
Wilmington business phone systems costs $335, voip phone systems costs $152.






						Carolina Beach Business Phone Systems					




Business Phone Systems Carolina Beach, NC
Carolina Beach Business Phone Systems Costs:
Carolina Beach business phone systems costs $413, voip phone systems costs $187.






						Castle Hayne Business Phone Systems					




Business Phone Systems Castle Hayne, NC
Castle Hayne Business Phone Systems Costs:
Castle Hayne business phone systems costs $361, voip phone systems costs $164.






						Wrightsville Beach Business Phone Systems					




Business Phone Systems Wrightsville Beach, NC
Wrightsville Beach Business Phone Systems Costs:
Wrightsville Beach business phone systems costs $355, voip phone systems costs $161.






						Kure Beach Business Phone Systems					




Business Phone Systems Kure Beach, NC
Kure Beach Business Phone Systems Costs:
Kure Beach business phone systems costs $336, voip phone systems costs $152.









          New Hanover County Business Phone Systems Companies
        





It Management & Consulting Llc2508 Independence Blvd, Ste 204Wilmington, NC 28412

Accu-call Answering Service2392 Carolina Blvd, # Site 204Wilmington, NC 28409

Teleco5221 Oleander DrWilmington, NC 28403

Mc Carter Electrical Co5744 Marguerite DrWilmington, NC 28403

Alternate Phone Systems5007 Wrightsville AveWilmington, NC 28403

Sound & Telephone Systems1501 Marstellar StWilmington, NC 28401

Century Link3205 Randall PkwyWilmington, NC 28403

Speros2410 Skidaway RdWilmington, NC 28401

Multi-comm Systems406 N Kerr AveWilmington, NC 28405

Accutel Business Phone Systems5940 Market StWilmington, NC 28405

Edens Telecom Inc5940 Market StWilmington, NC 28405

Divergintz Data Vox Solutionz311 Judges Rd, Ste 6aWilmington, NC 28405

Interconnect Products & Service311 Judges Rd, Ste 3cWilmington, NC 28405

Embarq Communications2940 Orville Wright WayWilmington, NC 28405 








          New Hanover County Business Phone Systems Zip Codes Served
        




			28401 | 28402 | 28403 | 28404 | 28405 | 28406 | 28407 | 28408 | 28409 | 28410 | 28411 | 28412 | 28428 | 28429 | 28449 | 28480 |       






Business Phone Systems in New Hanover County, NC



VOIP Phone Systems in New Hanover County, NC



PBX Phone Systems in New Hanover County, NC



Get Pricing on Business Phone Systems in New Hanover County, NC




Get Pricing














Business Phone Systems in New Hanover County
       Average Cost: $397 per employee
Starting At: $184


Show Less

CityAvg. CostLow CostHigh Cost
Carolina Beach
 $413$145$765Castle Hayne
 $361$168$676Kure Beach
 $336$184$762Wilmington
 $335$151$776Wrightsville Beach
 $355$155$784











VOIP Phone Systems in New Hanover County
       Average Cost: $180 per employee
Starting At: $95


Show Less

CityAvg. CostLow CostHigh Cost
Carolina Beach
 $187$75$358Castle Hayne
 $164$86$316Kure Beach
 $152$95$357Wilmington
 $152$78$363Wrightsville Beach
 $161$80$367











PBX Phone Systems in New Hanover County
       Average Cost: $492 per employee
Starting At: $212


Show Less

CityAvg. CostLow CostHigh Cost
Carolina Beach
 $512$167$775Castle Hayne
 $448$193$684Kure Beach
 $417$212$772Wilmington
 $416$174$786Wrightsville Beach
 $440$178$794











KSU Phone Systems in New Hanover County
       Average Cost: $381 per employee
Starting At: $206


Show Less

CityAvg. CostLow CostHigh Cost
Carolina Beach
 $397$163$761Castle Hayne
 $347$188$671Kure Beach
 $323$206$757Wilmington
 $322$169$771Wrightsville Beach
 $341$174$779






   Estimated prices cover initial 12 months and include cost per employee for phones & hardware, basic features (see above), tech support and one-time training. Advanced features, hardware upgrades and multi-office installation/set-up can add to the cost.





Other Categories in New Hanover County, NC


Dumpster RentalGarage DoorsJunk RemovalLawn CareMobile Office TrailersPaintersPaper Shredding ServicesPest ControlPlumbingPortable Storage ContainersPortable ToiletsRoofingTree RemovalTree ServiceWater Heaters 







Markets Near New Hanover County, NC


Pender County, NCBrunswick County, NCOnslow County, NCBladen County, NCDuplin County, NC 







Top Markets in North Carolina


Buncombe County, NCCabarrus County, NCCumberland County, NCDurham County, NCForsyth County, NCGaston County, NCGuilford County, NCMecklenburg County, NCUnion County, NCWake County, NC 












About Aptera

About Us
Employment Opportunities




Our Process
Contact




Become a Partner










	                    2017 © Aptera.com ALL Rights Reserved.
	                    Privacy | Terms | Copyright 









ĂClose
Login to Aptera







Username




Password



Wrong username or password


 Remember login
										 
(if this is a private computer)

Login




Become a Partner
You are a good fit for Aptera if you:

 Are Fully Licensed
 Are Fully Insured
 Are Highly Recommended
 Have a Good Track Record
 Offer Competitive Priced

Register Now!






























VoIP - Residential VoIP, Small Business VoIP by VOIPO
























The Likable Phone Company
 


vPanel Login
 







Call Us: 877-99-VOIPO

Amazing Customer Service
 
 
 




Residential VoIP

Business VoIP

Cloud VoIP

Reseller VoIP

Features

Hosted PBX

Support

 
 




2 Years of Unlimited Calling for $149

Save 75% or more on your phone bill by switching to VOIPo VoIP phone service.
Unlimited Calls to US/CanadaOver 40 Incredible Calling Features IncludedFree VoIP Adapter Lease. Free Shipping. Free Activation.
 



 
 




VoIP Services by VOIPo
VOIPo service allows you to replace your landline and use regular phones to make and receive virtually unlimited crystal-clear calls for one low price.  You can get a new number or transfer your existing number and it works with your regular phones (no computer required).

Offer Ends In

SALE:  2 Years for $14900
 
 



Unlimited Calls to US / Canada*60 Min Free Intl Calls Per Month*Over 40 Amazing FeaturesSend/Receive SMS Text MessagesFree Rollover LineVoIP Adapter Included30 Day Money Back GuaranteeAmazing Customer ServiceSALE - Today Only
 

Home
2 Years - $6.21/MoMonthly - $15/Mo

 

Small Business
2 Years - $6.21/MoMonthly - $15/Mo

 
 
 




Money Back Guarantee
Try VOIPo risk-free.  If you're not happy with it, just return the VoIP adapter we send you within 30 days for a full refund.
 



Amazing Customer Service
Need something?  We'd love to help!   Deal with knowledgeable support agents and friendly technicians that can actually solve your problems and help you.
 



International Rates
Low international calling rates to destinations all over the world.

Brazil*2.0¢Italy*2.0¢Portugal*2.0¢Canada* 0¢
Poland*2.0¢Sweden*2.0¢India*2.0¢Spain*2.0¢

Each plan includes 60 free minutes of international calling to selected destinations.  For a complete rate list and more information, click here.
 
 



We Actually Care
It may sound crazy in this day and age, but we care about your experience with our VoIP service and appreciate your business.  Really.
 

 

 


VoIP Service Features
Each account includes over 40 amazing features to make your life easier and your phone more functional than ever.  With VOIPo service, your phones will be doing things you never even imagined.
7, 10, and 11 Digit DialingCaller ID w/ NameCall Waiting
Amazing Customer ServicePortable VoIP DeviceSoftphone Access
Call Waiting IDThree Way CallingCall Forwarding
Call BlockingDo Not DisturbAnd More


 


Availability

1. Transfer a Number
If you have an existing phone number you want to keep, we can transfer it to VOIPO for you. Number transfers are free and easy.
 

2. Get a New Number
We have over 500,000 new phone numbers available in over 7,000 areas. Check if your area is available now.
Select Your StateSelect City
 
 


How Does VOIPo Work?
1) When you order our service, you can select a new phone number from over 7,000 available areas or transfer your existing number.
2) We'll ship you a VOIPo Phone Adapter. When you receive it, simply plug it into your broadband internet connection and plug your normal telephones into it. 
3) All done! Use your phone just like you normally would. When you place calls, the adapter sends the calls out through your internet connection to the VOIPo network instead of the regular phone network.


 


Why Choose VOIPo?

Save up to 75% on phone service.
Unlimited calling to US/Canada starting at $6.21 Monthly. We rely mostly on referrals and don't waste money on big ad campaigns. This saves you money.
Free international calling.
International calls to over 40 countries (60 minutes per month) included with Home and Home Office plan. Low international rates across the board.
Over 40 amazing features.
Over 40 amazing features are included with the Home and Home Office plan to help you control your phone service in ways you never even imagined.
Amazing Customer Service
Need something?  We'd love to help!   Deal with knowledgeable support agents and friendly technicians that can actually solve your problems and help you.
 

Financially sound.
Privately-owned, owner-managed debt-free, and profitable. No greedy investors to please here.
We Actually Care.
It may sound crazy in this day and age, but we care about your experience with our VoIP service and appreciate your business.  If you have something you can't resolve with our support team, you can even e-mail the owner directly for escalation and personal response.  Try that with the competition.
100% Satisfaction Guaranteed.
If you're not happy, just cancel within 30 days and return the VOIPo adapter to us and we'll refund 100% of your service fees. If you're not happy, we're not either.
 


Ready To Start Saving?
 




Additional Questions? Call Us at 949-829-4200
If you have additional questions about our VoIP plans, give us a call for assistance. Our support staff will be happy to help you out with anything!
 

 
 
 







We Actually Care
It may sound crazy in this day and age, but we care about your experience with our VoIP service and appreciate your business.  Really.
 

30 Day Guarantee
Try our VoIP service risk free.  If you're not happy, just return the VoIP adapter we send you within 30 days and you'll get a full refund.
 
 

 




VoIP Services


VoIP Phone Service
Toll-Free Numbers
Local Forwarded Numbers
Business Phone System
Hosted PBX
SMS Enabled Numbers
Resell VoIP Service

 

VOIPo


Support
Control Panel Login
VOIPO Blog
Knowledgebase
Customer Forums

 

Company


E911 Information
Terms of Service
Affiliate Program
Why VOIPo
Contact Us

 


VOIPo is a leading provider of VoIP services in the US offering residential VoIP, small business VoIP.





 
 

Copyright © 2006-2017 VOIPo.com, All Rights Reserved
















 
 





Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft









LLC in North Carolina | Form Your North Carolina LLC Online in MinutesForm Your North Carolina LLC in as little as 10 Minutes More businesses form as an LLC than any other entity Spend less time doing paperwork and more time running your business Protect your personal assets from business debts or liabilities  CHOOSE YOUR STATE OF FORMATIONAlabamaAlaskaArizonaArkansasCaliforniaColoradoConnecticutDelawareDistrict Of ColumbiaFloridaGeorgiaHawaiiIdahoIllinoisIndianaIowaKansasKentuckyLouisianaMaineMarylandMassachusettsMichiganMinnesotaMississippiMissouriMontanaNebraskaNevadaNew HampshireNew JerseyNew MexicoNew YorkNorth CarolinaNorth DakotaOhioOklahomaOregonPennsylvaniaRhode IslandSouth CarolinaSouth DakotaTennesseeTexasUtahVermontVirginiaWashingtonWest VirginiaWisconsinWyoming Get Started   Starting at $49. View pricing details info    Form Your North Carolina LLC Online in 3 Easy Steps - $49 + State Filing Fees Getting Started is EasyHave your business up and running in 3 easy steps. Tell us about your business Provide business detailsWe have taken the complexity out of forming your business. Our easy online form can be completed in as little as 10 minutes.We file the paperworkWe incorporate your business by preparing all required documents and filing them directly with the Secretary of State.Receive your documentsOnce your incorporation documents have been approved by the state, you will receive your completed LLC package by mail.Why North Carolina Business Owners Choose Swyft FilingsEvery day businesses from across the nation choose Swyft Filings to form their LLC.Here are a just a few of the reasons why so many owners choose us to help start their business. Trusted and ExperiencedOur Business Specialists will form your new business the correct way, saving you time and money by avoiding costly errors. Let us handle your business filings while you focus on growing your business. Personal Customer SupportEach one of our customers is assigned a personal Business Specialist. Have a question? Just call your personal Business Specialist directly. No need to wait in a pool of phone calls. Same Day ProcessingWhen you place your order through Swyft Filings, we can immediately start the process of forming your new business. Our processing times are some of the fastest in the industry.Choose the Right Business TypeCompare the important differences of each business structure to decidewhich one is right for your companyAdvantages of forming an LLCForming a Limited Liability Company is the easiest and most flexible way to start your business. LLCs provide personal asset protection which shields you from being personally liable for business debts. LLCs also allow you to spend less time doing paperwork and more time operating your business.Why choose an LLC? Personal Asset Protection Pass-Through Taxation Fewer Formalities Management FlexibilityPlus our  100% Satisfaction Guarantee  LLC   C Corp   S Corp   DBA  Protection Limited liability protection      LLCs provide personal asset protection, which shields you from being personally liable for business debts. C Corps provide personal asset protection, which shields you from being personally liable for business debts. S Corps provide personal asset protection, which shields you from being personally liable for business debts. Owners have no personal asset protection, which makes them personally liable for business debts. Managing Your Business Flexibility in management      LLCs must be member or manager managed according to the terms of the operating agreement. Member managed means the owners of the company manage the company. Manager-managed means the members (or owners) elect one or more managers to manage the company. C Corps are required to have shareholder elected directors who oversee and elect officers to run the day-to-day operations of the company. The business owner(s) can be the shareholder(s), the director(s) and officer(s). S Corps are required to have shareholder elected directors who oversee and elect officers to run the day-to-day operations of the company. The business owner(s) can be the shareholder(s), the director(s) and officer(s). The DBA owner may manage the business without restriction. Nonprofits are managed by their board of directors following the regulations set forth in their Bylaws. Ease of ownership changes Varies     Changes in ownership of an LLC are dependent on the terms of the operating agreement. Ownership changes in a C Corp are easily made through the sell of stock to new or existing shareholders. Ownership changes in an S Corp are easily made through the sell of stock to new or existing shareholders. DBAs cannot make ownership changes. Perpetual existence Varies     The life of the LLC is dependent of the terms of the operating agreement. Its existence may be short term or perpetual that survive the death or transfer of the membership interests of the original founders. C Corps are separate entities that survive the death or transfer of stock of the owners and/or major shareholders. S Corps are separate entities that survive the death or transfer of stock of the owners and/or major shareholders. DBAs end upon closure of the company or the death of the owner. Nonprofits are entities that survive any change in their board of directors. Ongoing formalities      Depending on the state of incorporation, an LLC may be required to file an annual report and/or pay franchise fees. After formation, C Corps have many ongoing formalities such as writing bylaws, selecting directors, holding initial and annual shareholder meetings, and issuing stock. After formation, S Corps have many ongoing formalities such as writing bylaws, selecting directors, holding initial and annual shareholder meetings, and issuing stock. There are no ongoing corporate formalities. Ability to raise capital Varies     LLCs are not allowed to sell stock but may be able to raise capital via bank loans, from its members and various other avenues. Any equity to sales to third parties needs to be done in compliance with SEC regulations. C Corps may issue many types of stocks, which may be sold to an unlimited number of shareholders. Any equity sales to third parties needs to be done in compliance with SEC regulations. S Corps may issue one type of stock, which may be sold to a maximum of 100 shareholders. Any equity sales to third parties needs to be done in compliance with SEC regulations. DBAs are not allowed to sell stock but may be able to obtain bank loans. Tax Pass-through taxation      LLCs are not taxed at the corporate level. Instead, all profit and losses are reported with the personal income taxes of each member. The income of the C Corp is taxed at the corporate level and then again at the shareholder level. S Corps are not taxed at the corporate level. Instead, all profit and losses are reported with the personal income taxes of each shareholder (owner). DBAs are not taxed at the company level. All profit and losses are reported on the personal income tax return of the owner. Double taxation      LLCs are not taxed at the corporate level. The income of the C Corp is taxed at the corporate level and then again at the shareholder level. S Corps are not taxed at the corporate level. DBAs are not taxed at the corporate level. State Filing Fees State formation fees      LLCs are required to pay formation fees to the state. Fees will vary based on the state of incorporation. C Corps are required to pay formation fees to the state. Fees will vary based on the state of incorporation. S Corps are required to pay formation fees to the state. Fees will vary based on the state of incorporation. There are required filing fees for DBAs. Fees will vary based on the county and state in which the DBA is filed. Ongoing compliance fees      Depending on the state of incorporation, reports and fees may be required. An annual report and franchise fees are generally due each year along with other reports and fees, which varies depending on the state of incorporation. An annual report and franchise fees are generally due each year along with other reports and fees, which varies depending on the state of incorporation. There are no ongoing compliance fees.  Get Started Get Started Get Started Get Started Are You Ready to Begin?Launch your business today starting at $49 + state fees. See detailed pricing We also offer a 3-Easy Payment Plan to help get your business up and running quickly. Start My LLC Today    Included in all of our packagesVerify Company Name Availability Preparation of Articles of Organization North Carolina LLC Filing with Secretary of State Dedicated Business Specialist 100% Satisfaction Guarantee Online Access to Your LLC Documents Certificate of Incorporation Lifetime Customer Support Delivery of Documents Common Questions About Starting an LLC in North CarolinaIf you have more questions, please give us a call at (877) 777-0454. We love to help!Should I form my business as an LLC?Despite being a relatively new option, the limited liability company (LLC) is now one of the most popular business structures among smaller organizations. While allowing business owners to remain free from a great deal of the regulations imposed on other types of companies, it still provides limited liability protection for its owners (members). This means that the personal assets of an LLC's ownership cannot be collected to fulfill the debts of the business. What is involved in forming an LLC?All states require potential LLC owners to file a substantial set of documents, typically called the Articles of Organization, in order to establish their business. We can take care of this process for you, saving you time, effort, and allowing you to focus on developing your business – not filing paperwork. How should I name my LLC?The name you choose for your LLC is an important decision, as it will be how you represent yourself to potential associates and clients. With that in mind, it is advisable that you take some time to craft a name that you will be proud to have representing you and your business.Your name must be unique, and not deceptively similar, to any other trademarked name or business. It is also required that your name not be used to intentionally misrepresent the products or services you offer. For LLCs, nearly all states will also require you to add a signifier of your limited liability status, such as "LLC" or "L.L.C." to the end of your company's name. You may be able to operate under a name other than your formal LLC name by applying for and using a dba. Are there a required number of individuals needed to form an LLC?There is no minimum requirement as to the number of owners (also referred to as members) that an LLC must have. At the federal level, single-member LLCs qualify for pass-through taxation, however this is not always true at the state level.  View All LLC FAQs BizQuiz™Answer a few simple questions so we can help you find the best legal structure for your company. BizCompare™View and compare the different types of business structures to help you understand the benefits of each.Ready to Start LLC in North Carolina?Let's Get Started CHOOSE YOUR STATE OF FORMATIONAlabamaAlaskaArizonaArkansasCaliforniaColoradoConnecticutDelawareDistrict Of ColumbiaFloridaGeorgiaHawaiiIdahoIllinoisIndianaIowaKansasKentuckyLouisianaMaineMarylandMassachusettsMichiganMinnesotaMississippiMissouriMontanaNebraskaNevadaNew HampshireNew JerseyNew MexicoNew YorkNorth CarolinaNorth DakotaOhioOklahomaOregonPennsylvaniaRhode IslandSouth CarolinaSouth DakotaTennesseeTexasUtahVermontVirginiaWashingtonWest VirginiaWisconsinWyoming BUSINESS TYPELLCC CorporationS CorporationNonprofitNext Step   Still have questions? We're here to help! Call (877) 777-0450 or Live Chat with us for real-time support. Incorporate your business starting at $49 © Copyright 2017 - Swyft Filings, LLC Terms of Service |  Privacy Policy |  Legal Disclaimer     Swyft Filings  has a Shopper Approved rating of  4.6/5 based on 8391 ratings and reviews   © Copyright 2017 - Swyft Filings, LLC  Terms of Service |  Privacy Policy |  Legal Disclaimer  Swyft Filings  has a Shopper Approved rating of  4.6/5 based on 8391 ratings and reviews   Swyft Filings is a document filing service. We are not a law firm and cannot offer legal advice. The information on our website is for general informational purposes only and is not legal advice. Use of the website is subject to our Terms of Service and Privacy Policy.




Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft













VoIP Service & Cloud Unified Communications | Vonage





');
			}
		        





















                           Vonage® Business 


                           Enterprise-grade cloud unified communications
                        
 


                        From sole proprietors to global enterprises with multiple locations, Vonage Business offers purpose-built cloud unified communications, feature-rich business phone systems, 15+ years of VoIP service experience, and award-winning customer support for every type of business.
                     

 GO TO VONAGE BUSINESS



New!


                                 + Vonage Business


                                Learn more now.
                            








Vonage® Residential  




                           People friendly VoIP service
                        
 


                        Vonage home phone solutions provide affordable residential VoIP phone service. We’re known for our quality, portability, and ease-of-use.  See why customers love our award-winning, mobile friendly VoIP service and support.
                     

 GO TO VONAGE RESIDENTIAL







 











Unified Communications & Business Phone Service | Vonage Business
















 





















						Get Vonage
					

						1.877.862.2562
					



HAVE US CONTACT YOU


SIGN UP FOR A DEMO



























						What We Do
						




								Unified Communications
							



										View All
									



										Business Phone Systems
									



										Contact Center
									



										Conferencing
									



										Integrations
									



										Mobility
									



										SIP Trunking
									





								Quality of Service
							



										View All
									



										SD WAN
									



										MPLS Network
									



										Bring Your Own Broadband
									





								Integrations
							



										View All
									



										Bullhorn
									



										Clio
									



										ConnectWise
									



										Desk.com
									



										G Suite
									



										JobDiva
									



										Microsoft Dynamics
									



										Netsuite
									



										Office 365
									



										Oracle
									



										Salesforce
									



										Web Launcher
									



										Zendesk
									



										Zoho CRM
									





								COMMUNICATION APIs
							



										View All
									



										SMS
									



										Voice
									



										Authentication
									



										Chat Apps
									



										Number Insight
									





								Products
							



										View All
									



										Vonage Essentials
										
											Robust, Intuitive & Small Business FriendlyAmazon Chime Now Included In All Plans
										




										Vonage Premier
										
											Enterprise-grade Unified Communications
										




										Nexmo The Vonage API Platform
										
											Innovative, Cloud-based Building Blocks
										




										Phones & Accessories
									





								View All
							






						Our Solutions
						




								By Your Business Need
							



										View All
									



										Reduce Communication Cost
									



										Move Communications to the Cloud
									



										Start a New Office
									



										Upgrade a Business Phone System
									



										Connect Virtual Teams & Offices
									



										Record Employee Calls
									



										Launch a Contact Center
									





								By Your Business Industry
							



										View All
									



										Accounting
									



										Finance
									



										Healthcare
									



										Insurance
									



										Law Firms
									



										Marketing 
									



										Real Estate
									





								By Your Business Size
							



										View All
									



										Small Business
										
											Get top voice and data quality on your current internet. See how on our intuitive plug-and-play business phone system.
										




										Mid-Sized/Enterprise
										
											Get unified communications on the nation’s largest MPLS network. See how with our top QoS and end-to-end customer service.
										






								View All
							






						Vonage Advantage
						




								Our Advantage
							



										View All
									



										Quality of Service
									



										Ease of Use & Deployment
									



										Innovation
									



										Orange Glove Service
									



										Referral Program & Customer Perks
									





								RECOGNITIONS
							



										View All
									



										2016 Growth Excellence Leadership Award
									



										Channel Program Excellence in Cloud Communication
									



										Gartner's Magic Quadrant for UCaaS, Worldwide
									





								Case Studies
							



										View All
									



										Cutting costs and enabling mobile workers with Virtual Receptionist.
									



										Making waves with voice and video collaboration.
									





								View All
							






						Perspectives
						




								View Latest Articles
							



								Business in the Cloud
								
									From basic milestones to deep dives into new cloud integrations, learn how to optimize your business cloud communications.
								




								Collaboration
								
									Insight to help business connect and collaborate better with their customers, employees, and vendors.
								




								Digital Office
								
									The traditional office has traded up to a virtual team model. Learn how to keep up with the latest trends.
								




								Network Backbone
								
									Get tips on how to develop flexible networks, strong infrastructures and better supported operations teams.
								




								Industry Trends
								
									Keep up with the trends in business communications and technology that impact your business, profession, and industry.
								







								Publications
							



								Nexmo Blog
								




								The Garage
								




								Dialog
								







						Partner With Us
						




								Channel Partner Programs
								
									Earn competitive revenue on our comprehensive communications solution and grow your business with help from our stellar support and training.
								




								Technology Alliances
								
									Join us as we continue to expand into new areas and build alliances with like-minded innovators.
								




								Referral Partner Program
								
									Create a new revenue stream within your current business model. You bring the referral, and we do all the heavy lifting to make the sale.
								




								Already a Vonage Partner?
								
									Login
								





						        View All
					        






Get Vonage
1.877.862.2562





						Support
					




						Download Apps
					




						Login
					




FAQs


Make a Referral


Contact Us










Home 






		Share
	



























Business communications are people communications, that's why we make it easier to…



Work face-to-face, virtually
Integrate with business applications
Get 24/7 customer support
Reduce phone system costs







      NEW!
    





+ Vonage Business
Find out more.














Unified Communications for Enterprise




									Cloud capabilities, managed support, SD-WAN and a private MPLS network.
								 




								UNIFIED COMMUNICATIONS
							






Phone Systems for Small Business




									Easy and reliable business phone service with 40+ features, including Amazon Chime video and web conferencing, via your existing internet.
								 




								SMALL BUSINESS SOLUTIONS
							






Communication APIs




									Innovative Nexmo™ APIs that help you transform your customer experience.
								 




								COMMUNICATION APIs
							








 






Introducing Amazon Chime: Working Together, Simplified
Backed by powerful cloud technology, Amazon Chime offers all-in-one high-definition video and audio conferencing, chat, screen sharing and more. It’s frustration-free, built for a mobile world, and backed by a high quality network-- and now included in all Vonage Essentials business phone plans at no extra cost.
FIND OUT MORE.



Customizable Contact Centers
Create efficient and effective contact centers that can integrate with your current CRM software. Create help desks. Support online retail. Manage sales and training.
LEARN MORE



Work Anywhere, on Any Device
Give them space to be productive with BYOD (bring-your-own-device) model, cloud-driven VOIP, video calling /conferencing, IM, and collaborative capabilities.
LEARN MORE











If communication is key, we’ve got your keys right here. 










					Mobility
				

Work on the go with features and integrations that boost productivity.











					Conferencing
				

Collaborate better with high-quality voice, video and web solutions.











					Integrations
				

Tie business phone service into top business cloud applications for efficiency.











					Call Centers
				

Engage your customers one-on-one with tools for voice, video, chat and even social.










    Get Orange Glove Service
  

    (It’s like white-glove service, but better)
  








        Get Orange Glove Service
      

        (It’s like white-glove service, but better)
      






Comprehensive needs assessment
We’ll help your business assess the best communication solution for your budget.





Stellar Customer Support
Once your system is up, our award-winning IT support is only a click or phone call away. 








Customize & save
Choose add-on features and integrations for each extension, not by system. Even get multi-line discounts. 





Not support people, experts
Talk to enthusiastic, IT specialists whose knowledge comes from hands on experience.





SEE THE VONAGE ADVANTAGE









500,000+ 

			business users trust Vonage Business for award-winning excellence
		












2016 Growth Excellence Leadership Award













Channel Program Excellence in Cloud Communication













Gartner's Magic Quadrant for UCaaS, Worldwide










                    OUR BUSINESS COMMUNICATIONS PRODUCTS
                

                    Business grade. People friendly.™


                    From a cloud-hosted phone system on your current broadband to a unified communications solution on a dedicated network, we can build custom communications for every business and every budget.
                






Vonage® Essentials
Robust, intuitive, and small business friendly:




Runs on your high-speed internet connection



40+ features to help you customize your business communications



Mobile and desktop applications enable mobile working and virtual teams



High-quality voice, point to point video, and messaging



Includes the Amazon Chime Pro tier, offering chat, screen share, video and web conferencing



Integrates with the business applications you use everyday



Easily scales as your business grows



Simple activation and setup with 24/7 customer support



Month-to-month contracts available









                                EXPLORE ESSENTIALS
                            

SEE PLANS & PRICING









Vonage® Premier
Enterprise-grade unified communications:




Enterprise-grade unified communications



Hybrid network and bring your own broadband options with SD-WAN



One of the nation’s largest purpose-built MPLS networks



Elevated quality of service for voice, video, and data communications



Advanced features including conferencing for up to 300 users



Mobile and desktop applications enable mobile working and virtual teams



Reliable and scalable solutions for inbound, outbound, and multi-site contact centers



Deep integration ties phone service to top business applications



End-to-end managed installation and dedicated service teams









                                EXPLORE PREMIER
                            

SEE PLANS















								
				Perspectives
				
							


Enjoy Vacation with Cloud-Based Business Tools


7.28.17










								
				Perspectives
				
							


How Enterprise Voice Solutions Deliver Even Greater Value Through APIs


7.27.17


















						CALL US
					

						Want a free consultation?
					

1.877.862.2562









LET USCALL YOU


						Let us give you a call.
					

ENTER YOUR INFO















				We'll call you right now.
			







I'm an existing customer



Call Me


					Please enter a valid phone number.





			By clicking the "Call Me" button, you consent to receive a phone call from Vonage at the phone number provided. Your consent does not require or imply that a purchase be made. These calls may be connected through an automated technology.
		








				We are calling you right now...



Didn't work? Try again










Request a Free Quote









Comments





















Number of Lines
1-5 Lines
6-10 Lines
Other








					Get My Quote
				



There was a problem with some of your entries. Please correct the fields marked above.








Thank You.A specialist will contact you soon.
	
You can contact us any time by calling 1.877.862.2562 or email sales@vonagebusiness.com.













 




Voice Transport via Telecom Services | West Corporation

















































































Menu 





 






 





HyperCube is now West Telecom Services


We are excited to announce that effective December 1st, 2015 we have changed our company name to West Telecom Services to better align with our parent company West Corporation. The new name reflects a unified brand within West Corporation and our collective commitment to delivering world class service and maximizing value for our customers.











Reliable Connections. Simple Solutions. Broad Coverage.


Our team of experts will work with you to design a solution and an interconnection architecture that meets your needs.



LEARN MORE











We deliver simple solutions backed by a secure network.


West Telecom Services owns and operates IP-capable redundant switches across the country from Los Angeles to New York. Our network reliability is why the leading wireless and competitive service providers in the U.S. trust us to terminate their toll free and long distance traffic.



LEARN MORE






 








Menu











Tandem Voice Transfer Services
for Telecom Companies




The ability to reach out and connect with the people around us is more vital and more common than ever before. Every day, we need to collaborate with peers, communicate with customers and keep pace with a rapidly changing world. Not only are these interactions more frequent and more vital, but it now happens using a multitude of technologies from an ever-increasing variety of providers. At the core of the networks that make it all happen is a rapid convergence and the need to efficiently address evolving network architectures and protocols. West’s Telecom Services thrives at the center of these disparate networks, providing interconnection services for all types of providers, including: wireless, wireline, cable and voice over Internet protocol (VoIP).
West’s Telecom Services operates a next-generation national network, providing carrier-grade interconnections, reducing costs and merging traditional telecom, mobile and IP technologies onto a common, efficient backbone.
West’s custom telephone number manager system provides an exceptional level of call control, and our least-cost routing engine drives market-leading efficiencies using our own network as well as those of selected underlying carriers. Through our toll-free termination and direct inward dial services, West provides carriers with a more efficient, flexible and reliable competitive tandem solution.
We implement cutting-edge technologies that are then used to make our customers more efficient and competitive. This is the West advantage we deliver and why we win our customers’ business day by day, call by call, idea by idea. Not only today, but we are constantly anticipating our customers’ needs and planning for how to take our services to the next level so we can provide an even more valuable connection tomorrow.





Carrier-grade solutions for efficient and
cost-effective call routing












Direct Inward Dialing
Our Direct Inward Dialing (DID) service allows customers to be reached from anywhere on the Public Switched Telephone Network (PSTN).
Learn More


Direct Inward Dialing



 





TerminationServices
We offer simple and cost-effective solutions to expand your network reach.
Learn More


TerminationServices



 





Toll FreeTermination
Our feature-rich toll free termination service aggregates and terminates toll-free calls to the appropriate toll free subscriber based on customer-defined routing parameters.
Learn More


Toll FreeTermination



 





Toll FreeOrigination
Toll free origination transports and switches toll free calls originating from traditional wireline, VoIP, cable and wireless carriers to all major Inter-exchange Carriers (IXCs) in the United States.
Learn More


Toll FreeOrigination



 





Terminating AccessTandem
Route your telephone numbers behind Telecom Services tandems and let us be your total solution tandem provider.
Learn More


Terminating AccessTandem



 





ClientCenter
Visit the West Telecom Services Client Center for convenient access to client logins and more. 
Learn More


ClientLogin



 

 
 









 






West Telecom Services processes over 3 billion calls each month.




LEARN MORE





 

















Follow West:
 
 
 
 
 











©2004 - 2017 West Corporation. All Rights Reserved. 
          Legal & Privacy | 
          Diversity | 
          Tariffs | 
          Blog & Corporate News | 
          Investor News | 
          Contact






 
West Corporation





   
 




utility-side-menu
 

























IP Phone Systems, IP Phones, VoIP Reseller - Voiplink 1.866.987.8647






































JavaScript seems to be disabled in your browser.
                    You must have JavaScript enabled in your browser to utilize the functionality of this website.                





Toll Free: 866.987.VOIP








Voiplink



 












International Orders




                Cart (0 items)


Log InSign Up












Cart Subtotal: $0.00











                Edit cart            









    
x








Add to Cart








Our price is lower than the manufacturer's "minimum advertised price."  As a result, we cannot show you the price in catalog or the product page.  You have no obligation to purchase the product once you know the price. You can simply remove the item from your cart.
Our price is lower than the manufacturer's "minimum advertised price."  As a result, we cannot show you the price in catalog or the product page.  You have no obligation to purchase the product once you know the price. You can simply remove the item from your cart.













Phones & Systems








Networking







Headsets
























Product Catalog


Vivotek h.265 Sale Weekly Specials Featured Products PhonesVoIP Phones (216)Digital Phones (38)Analog Phones (22)Conference Phones (74)Speakerphones (18)Wi-Fi SIP Phones (2)Hospitality Phones (380)Accessories (279) Wireless HeadsetsWireless Dect (10)Bluetooth Wireless (3)Wireless Headset Accesories (2) Road Headsets HeadsetsAastra Compatible Headsets (84)Avaya Compatible Headsets (11)Cisco Compatible Headsets (11)Digium Compatible Headsets (34)Grandstream Compatible Headsets (63)Fanvil Compatible Headsets (10)Linksys Compatible Headsets (94)NEC Compatible Headsets (9)Nortel Compatible Headsets (32)Polycom Compatible Headsets (43)Snom Compatible Headsets (50)Unify Compatible Headsets (36)Yealink Deskphone Compatible Headsets (75)USB Headsets (113)Bluetooth Headsets (47)Addasound Headsets (29)AT&T Headsets (6)Jabra Headsets (35)Plantronics Headsets (141)Sennheiser Headsets (145)Spracht HeadsetsVTech Headsets (2)VXI Headsets (22)Accessories (187)Smart Phone Compatible Headsets (3) Phone SystemsVoIP (557)Digital (5)Hybrid (93)Analog (3)Avaya Communication Manager (16)PBX Hardware Skype/Lync OptimizedHeadsets (54)VoIP Phones (13)Conference & Speakerphones (8) Call Recording / AcctCall Recording (34)Call Accounting Connectivity & ToolsABA (22)DynacomPlatinum ToolsDamac (27) Video Conferencing NetworkingSwitches (271)Routers (58)EnGenius Access Points / Bridges (23)EnGenius Wi-Fi Bundle Kits (6)Power Over Ethernet (93)Engenius EWS (9)Cisco Rack Mount Kits (16)Wireless Networking (24)Cisco Aironet (22) SBC/Gateways/ATAATA's (33)Gateways (280)SBC's (2) UPS/Surge ProtectionMinuteman UPS Systems (97)Minuteman Surge Protection (14)Minuteman RPM Power Managers (5)Minuteman MMPD Power Distribution Units (14) Paging / IntercomBogen (130)Cyberdata (26)Fanvil (11)Snom (2)Valcom Paging Solutions (6)Viking Communication Solutions (5)Wheelock (10) Cameras/SecurityNVR and Camera Bundles (7)Surveillance NVR's (160)Champ (71)Grandstream (2)NEC (13)Nuuo (106)Uniden (12)Vitek (223)VivotekZavio Consumer ElectronicsEnGenius Home Networking (9) Business VoiceCloud PBXSIP Trunking ClearanceVoIP Gateways (5)Phones (32)Headsets (18)Accessories/Cables (7)Networking Equipment (4)Security Products (1) Manufacturers3CX (31)ABA (22)Addasound (29)Adtran (25)AT&T (15)Audiocodes (141)Avaya (176)Bogen (150)Cisco (474)ClearOne (9)Cortelco (57)CyberData (26)Dialogic (9)Digium (358)D-Link (1)DrayTek (19)Dynacom (548)EnGenius (109)Epygi (116)Fanvil (32)Grandstream (79)Hansen Software (63)HP (5)Intelligent Recording (16)Jabra (169)Konftel (29)Logitech (19)Linksys (7)Matrix (3)Minuteman (170)Mitel (81)MultiTechNEC (78)Netgear (51)Nuuo (125)Nortel (127)OpenVox (322)Panasonic (3)Patton (19)Platinum Tools (688)Plantronics (224)Polycom (55)Positron (9)Quintum (17)RCA Telefield (27)Samsung (135)Sangoma (61)Sennheiser (203)SMC Networks (53)Shoretel (3)Snom (47)Spectralink (4)Softalk (16)Tadiran (6)Talkswitch (1)Teledex (4)Toshiba (1)Ubiquiti (192)trixbox (10)Uniden (23)Unify (23)Valcom (221)Viking (556)Vitek (302)Vivotek (273)VTech (24)Vodavi (9)Wheelock (10)VXI (222)Xorcom (316)Yeastar (61)Yealink (58)ZoomSwitch (2)Zyxel (290)Zavio (11) Yeastar S Series Special




































↑ Top



Company Info
About Us
Contact Us
Careers
Government & Education
Secondary Market Disclaimer 

Customer Service
Support
Product Returns
Product Warranties
Extended Warranties
Payment FAQ 

Quick Links
VoIP Learning Center
Request a Quote
Privacy Policy
Terms & Conditions
International Orders 

About VoIPLINKtm
When it comes to VoIP Equipment, we know our stuff. At VoIPLINK, LLC we’ve got the experience you want, the products you need, and customer service that can’t be beat in the VoIP market. Have a question or need more information? Give us a call today!
866-987-VoIP 




© 2015 VoIPLINK. All Rights Reserved.(ver. 1.8.1.0)








Contact Vonage Support











Business
Residential


Support
Sign In/My Account
Español





 Forgot username 

 Forgot password 













Topics



Community Topics


Account & Billing


Technical Support


Features & Settings


General Discussion


News & Highlights







Support Topics
                                            Billing & Payment
                                            Manage Account
                                            Technical Support
                                            Features & Settings
                                            Plans & Services
                                            New Customer
                                            Support Videos

Community





Community









Vonage Personal Support

Enter a search topic
























                            Getting Started & Installation


                            Technical Issue


                            Billing & Payment


                            Features & Settings


                            Calling Plans & International Rates


                            Reset Password & Update Account Info


                            Phone Number Transfer


                            Mobile Apps


                            Cancel Account


                            Order Vonage Service





Support HomeContact Vonage






Automated Payment Hotline
Call: 1-800-528-7690 to make a payment, check your account balance or update your credit card.


Chat With Us


Click to Chat
Chat is currently unavailable.


An agent should be available in 48 seconds.




Hours of operation:
Monday - Sunday: 24 HoursIt is currently Friday, 11:36 PM EDT




Call Us

U.S. Customers:1-866-243-4357
En Español:1-866-243-4357
Hours of operation:Monday - Friday 9 a.m. - 12 a.m. ETSaturday/Sunday 9 a.m. - 7 p.m. ET
Outside the U.S., Canada or the UK, see:International Customer Support



Email Us
Send us an email.We will respond within 24 hours.
Hours of operation:24 hours a day, 7 days a week


Ask the Community
Join our Community to exchange tips and ideas with other customers on how to get the most out of your Vonage service.
























 Business 
 Residential 
 Why Vonage 
 Mobile Apps 
 Vonage Home Phone 




Vonage Support
Support
Community
FAQs
911 Dialing
Retail Activation
Store Locator




About Us
Contact Us
Careers
Investor Relations
Vonage Corporate
Blog




International Sites
Canada
United Kingdom









Find a Local Vonage Retailer
FIND


Sign up to receive notifications on the latest Vonage Offerings
SUBMIT








fac twi pls inTo Order Call 1-800-608-5590








© 2017 Vonage

                                        Legal
                                        
Privacy PolicyE911








¹Unlimited Calling is based on normal residential, non-commercial use. A combination of factors is used to determine abnormal use, including but not limited to: the number of unique numbers called, calls forwarded, minutes used and other factors. Subject to our Reasonable Use Policy and Terms of Service.
HIGH-SPEED INTERNET REQUIRED. VALID FOR NEW ACCOUNTS ONLY. RATES EXCLUDE INTERNET SERVICE, FEES AND TAXES. Extensions® permits inbound and outbound calling on up to two additional registered phones at the home calling plan rates. If you subscribe to plans with monthly minutes allotments (for example, U.S. & Canada 400), all call minutes placed from both your home and registered Extensions® phones will count toward your monthly minutes allotment. Extensions® calls made from mobiles use data or airtime and may incur surcharges, depending on your mobile plan. The number transfer process takes approximately 10 business days from the time you confirm your transfer request. Alarms, TTY and other systems may not be compatible. Vonage 911 service operates differently than traditional 911. See www.vonage.com/911 for details.
†Limited time offer. Valid for new customers only who are residents of the 48 contiguous United States, 18 years or older.  Cannot be combined with any other promotional offer.  Offer good while supplies last. Limited one prepaid or gift card ("Card") per household.  An eligible customer must be active and in good standing and subscribe to Vonage for two bill cycles.  After approval of eligibility, allow 5-10 business days for the Card to be issued.  Terms and conditions are applied to the Cards.  Vonage has the sole right to decide all matters and disputes arising from the Card, and all decisions are final.  All taxes on Cards are solely Customer's responsibility.  Vonage is not responsible for any damage to the Card sustained during delivery or product defects of any kind.  In the event that the Card becomes unavailable for any reason, Vonage reserves the right to provide a substitute of similar type and value. Visa prepaid card is issued by MetaBank®, Member FDIC, pursuant to a license from Visa U.S.A. Inc. 
© 2017 Vonage










Personal

Overview
Plans
Features
Mobile App
Calling Cards


Small Business 
Mid-Market & Enterprise 

Why Vonage

Overview
How Vonage Works
Customer Reviews
Awards & Reviews



Vonage Support

Support 
FAQs 
911 Dialing 
Retail Activation 
Store Locator 



About Us

Contact Us
Careers
Investor Relations
Vonage Corporate



International Sites

Canada
United Kingdom











Find a Local Vonage Retailer

FIND



Sign up to receive notifications on the latest Vonage offerings
SUBMIT







fac twi pls in








© 2016 Vonage


                                        Legal
                                        
 | Privacy Policy | E911








¹Unlimited Calling is based on normal residential, non-commercial use. A combination of factors is used to determine abnormal use, including but not limited to: the number of unique numbers called, calls forwarded, minutes used and other factors. Subject to our Reasonable Use Policy and Terms of Service.
HIGH-SPEED INTERNET REQUIRED. VALID FOR NEW ACCOUNTS ONLY. RATES EXCLUDE INTERNET SERVICE, FEES AND TAXES. Extensions® permits inbound and outbound calling on up to two additional registered phones at the home calling plan rates. If you subscribe to plans with monthly minutes allotments (for example, U.S. & Canada 400), all call minutes placed from both your home and registered Extensions® phones will count toward your monthly minutes allotment. Extensions® calls made from mobiles use data or airtime and may incur surcharges, depending on your mobile plan. The number transfer process takes approximately 10 business days from the time you confirm your transfer request. Alarms, TTY and other systems may not be compatible. Vonage 911 service operates differently than traditional 911. See www.vonage.com/911 for details.
© 2016 Vonage







VoIP Phone Service Provider - How Vonage Works

 


















							Why Vonage
							



									Why Switch to Vonage
								



									How Vonage Works
								



									Customer Reviews
								



									Awards Reviews
								





							Plans
							



									See All Plans
								



									Vonage® North America
								



									Vonage World®



									U.S. & Canada 400
								



									Vonage® 3000 To Globe® Philippines
								



									For Business





							Features
							



									See All Features
								



									Vonage® Extensions® App
								



									boomerang™
								



									Add a Line
								



									Virtual Number
								



									Toll-Free Plus®



									Dedicated Fax Line
								



									Enhanced Call Forwarding
								



									Vonage Voicemail Plus
								



									SimulRing®



									Selective Call Block
								





							Offers
						


Business




				Log in
			



















						To Order Call 1-800-608-5590















How Vonage works
Unlock the Vonage advantage









How Vonage works
Who says that copper telephone lines are the best way to make calls?  Not us.  By tapping into your existing high-speed Internet service, Vonage transforms your phone service into a crystal clear, digital calling solution that can help save you money.
Literally tens of millions of people have turned to VoIP (Voice over Internet Protocol) services and this number continues to grow.  Your device simply plugs into your Internet router and then into your phone.  It’s that easy.  Plus it comes with advanced calling features like Vonage Visual Voicemail, which transcribes your voicemail messages and sends them to your email as text.  With Vonage® Extensions® you can make and receive nationwide and even internationals calls on your mobile phone – all as part of your home phone plan (carrier data rates may apply).  And, when you switch to Vonage you can keep your existing number for free.  You should expect more from your home phone service.  We get it, and we got it.








Get Started!
Vonage set-up is a snap
Unplug your internet router from the AC outlet.
Connect your Vonage Box™ to the router with the included blue cable.
Plug your router back into the AC outlet.
Connect the provided power supply to your Vonage Box and into an AC outlet.
Connect your home phone to the Vonage Box with a regular phone cable.
Listen for a dial tone.

Congratulations! You can start making calls.FIND A PLAN







Sorry unavailable








FAQs
Learn more about how Vonage works






How is Vonage® different from my landline phone service?






One big difference is that Vonage works over the Internet. You get everything you’d expect from a landline, plus the ability to take your home phone plan with you on your mobile—even make and receive home phone calls on up to two smartphones when you download our Vonage Extensions® app.







How does Vonage work with mobile phones?






In a few different ways. With Vonage Extensions®, you can link your mobile phone to your plan and get the same great international rates on the go.* If you have an iPhone® or Android™ device, the Vonage Extensions® app makes calling even easier. If you don’t have a Vonage plan, our Vonage Mobile app lets you make free high-definition calls and video calls, and send free texts, video messages and photos to anyone with the app, anywhere in the world.** You also get amazing low rates on international calls to anyone who doesn’t have the app.  *Calls made outside of Wi-Fi networks will use your data plan and, depending on your plan, data-usage rates may apply.  **Standard data rates may apply.







Can I keep my current phone number?






Yes. In most cases you can keep your current phone number. You’ll be able to check if your number can be transferred using the Keep Your Phone Number tool found in the tools module near the bottom of every plan page. If your number is transferable, we’ll help you bring it over to Vonage. And because transfers usually take about 7-10 business days, we’ll give you a temporary phone number so you can start using your Vonage service right away.







What do I need to get started with Vonage?






You'll just need the following:    • A broadband internet connection (such as DSL or cable) • A U.S. billing and shipping address • A Vonage Box™ (included with your online purchase) • Any touch tone phone (corded or cordless) • Credit Card • E-Mail address







Can I install Vonage myself?






Yes, it’s very simple. An installation guide is included with your Vonage Box. There are also easy-to-follow instructions on the How Vonage Works page.







Will I still receive calls if my power or Internet service goes out?






Yes. Just set up your Network Availability Number when you sign up, and during an outage, all calls are forwarded to the landline or cell number you provided.





SEE ALL FAQS 







24 hour live support
Answers are just a click—away
Easy ways to find the answers you need, 24 hours a dayVISIT VONAGE SUPPORT












Business


Residential


Why Vonage


Mobile Apps


Vonage Home Phone





Vonage SupportSupport
Community
FAQs
911 Dialing
Retail Activation
Store Locator



About UsContact Us
Careers
Investor Relations
Vonage Corporate
Blog



International SitesCanada
United Kingdom








Find a local Vonage retailer
FIND

Sign up to receive notifications on the latest Vonage offerings
SUBMIT







fac twi pls inTo Order Call 1-800-608-5590









© 2017 Vonage
LegalPrivacy PolicyE911








¹Unlimited Calling is based on normal residential, non-commercial use. A combination of factors is used to determine abnormal use, including but not limited to: the number of unique numbers called, calls forwarded, minutes used and other factors. Subject to our Reasonable Use Policy and Terms of Service.
HIGH-SPEED INTERNET REQUIRED. VALID FOR NEW ACCOUNTS ONLY. RATES EXCLUDE INTERNET SERVICE, FEES AND TAXES. Extensions® permits inbound and outbound calling on up to two additional registered phones at the home calling plan rates. If you subscribe to plans with monthly minutes allotments (for example, U.S. & Canada 400), all call minutes placed from both your home and registered Extensions® phones will count toward your monthly minutes allotment. Extensions® calls made from mobiles use data or airtime and may incur surcharges, depending on your mobile plan. The number transfer process takes approximately 10 business days from the time you confirm your transfer request. Alarms, TTY and other systems may not be compatible. Vonage 911 service operates differently than traditional 911. See www.vonage.com/911 for details.
© 2017 Vonage











Summer Sales Event
Give your Summer a lift with a $50 Visa Gift Card†! Just sign up using promo code: SUMMERTOSAVE
Terms and restrictions apply.† Visa® Prepaid card is issued by Metabank™, member of FDIC, pursuant to a license from the Visa U.S.A. Inc.


Call for Offer:
1-800-608-5590
LEARN MORE or 				GET OFFER NOW






Call now for our Summer Savings offer:
1-800-975-0580


†Limited time offer. Valid for new customers only who are residents of the 48 contiguous United States, 18 years or older.  Cannot be combined with any other promotional offer.  Offer good while supplies last. Limited one prepaid or gift card ("Card") per household.  An eligible customer must be active and in good standing and subscribe to Vonage for two bill cycles.  After approval of eligibility, allow 5-10 business days for the Card to be issued.  Terms and conditions are applied to the Cards.  Vonage has the sole right to decide all matters and disputes arising from the Card, and all decisions are final.  All taxes on Cards are solely Customer's responsibility.  Vonage is not responsible for any damage to the Card sustained during delivery or product defects of any kind.  In the event that the Card becomes unavailable for any reason, Vonage reserves the right to provide a substitute of similar type and value. Visa prepaid card is issued by MetaBank®, Member FDIC, pursuant to a license from Visa U.S.A. Inc. 



Summer Sales Event
 Give your Summer a lift with a $50 Visa Gift Card†! Just sign up using promo code:  SUMMERTOSAVE


12-Month Promotion
$9 .99/month


Plus taxes & fees, with 1-year agreement.High-speed Internet required.
FREE activationFREE shipping
View Offer Terms

Terms and restrictions apply.† Visa® Prepaid card is issued by Metabank™, member of FDIC, pursuant to a license from the Visa U.S.A. Inc.


ORDER NOW
LEARN MORE





Summer Sales Event
Give your Summer a lift with a  $50 Visa gift card†Just sign up using promo code: SUMMERTOSAVE
$9.99/month for a full year
Terms and restrictions apply.† Visa® Prepaid card is issued by Metabank™, member of FDIC, pursuant to a license from the Visa U.S.A. Inc.View Offer Terms.
Order Now
LEARN MORE






Summer Sales Event
Give your Summer a lift with a $50 Visa Gift Card†.  Just sign up using promo code:  SUMMERTOSAVE

Terms and restrictions apply.† Visa® Prepaid card is issued by Metabank™, member of FDIC, pursuant to a license from the Visa U.S.A. Inc.
 




Get a $50 Visa Gift Card after signing up with Vonage.

Use promo code SUMMERTOSAVE
Terms and restrictions apply.† Visa® Prepaid card is issued by Metabank™, member of FDIC, pursuant to a license from the Visa U.S.A. Inc.



 

');
		document.write('');
	} else {
		novega.console.info("Omniture Suppressed");
	}
		


Home Phone Service Providers & International Calling Plans | Vonage US




 


















							Why Vonage
							



									Why Switch to Vonage
								



									How Vonage Works
								



									Customer Reviews
								



									Awards Reviews
								





							Plans
							



									See All Plans
								



									Vonage® North America
								



									Vonage World®



									U.S. & Canada 400
								



									Vonage® 3000 To Globe® Philippines
								



									For Business





							Features
							



									See All Features
								



									Vonage® Extensions® App
								



									boomerang™
								



									Add a Line
								



									Virtual Number
								



									Toll-Free Plus®



									Dedicated Fax Line
								



									Enhanced Call Forwarding
								



									Vonage Voicemail Plus
								



									SimulRing®



									Selective Call Block
								





							Offers
						


Business




				Log in
			



















						To Order Call 1-800-608-5590























Vonage® North America
Unlimited¹ Nationwide calling.
NEW! Unlimited calling to Mexico. Plus Canada & Puerto Rico.
$9 .99/mo fora full year
FREE Phone Adapter FREE Shipping  FREE Activation  $119 Value
Plus taxes & fees, with 1-year agreement.High-speed internet required.View Offer Terms.
ORDER NOW
LEARN MORE





Vonage North America
Unlimited¹ nationwide calling.
NEW! Unlimited calling to Mexico. Plus Canada & Puerto Rico.

$9 .99/mo fora full year
FREE Phone Adapter FREE Shipping  FREE Activation  $119 Value
Plus taxes & fees, with 1-year agreement.High-speed internet required.View Offer Terms.
ORDER NOW
LEARN MORE



Now Get a $20 Macy's Gift Card.
Sign up by x/x/xx
Where do you call the most?
We have crazy generous plans for you.
Not looking for home phone service?
 more products 








How Vonage home phone service works



Vonage's VoIP phone service uses your Internet connection to make and receive calls. And with our great features, you can take your Vonage number with you on your smartphone.
Watch this introductory videoto learn more:







Sorry unavailable







Use Vonage your way

Powerful, easy to set up features that add value to every plan





Vonage® Extensions®
Take your Vonage number anywhere you use your smartphone.



												
												
												Learn More
											





SimulRing®
Don't have a SmartPhone?  Or need more than two SmartPhones to ring?



												
												
												Learn More
											





Vonage Voicemail Plus
Listen to your messages or get them delivered to your e-mail.



												
												
												Learn More
											





Virtual Number
Set up a Virtual Number so friends and family in other countries can reach you for the price of a local call.



												
												
												Learn More
											





Add A Line
It’s easy to add a phone line to your account.



												
												
												Learn More
											





Dedicated Fax Line
Free up your home phone by adding a fax line.



												
												
												Learn More
											





Toll-Free Plus®
Let others call you for free.



												
												
												Learn More
											





Enhanced Call Forwarding
Answer your home phone calls from just about anywhere.



												
												
												Learn More
											








Great international calling plans
Where do you call the most?








Customers love Vonage









Savings & Value







Satisfaction







Customer Service







Extensions® App









Awards & Reviews
See how we compare to the competition.


"Keeping in touch has never been easier, cheaper or more convenient with Vonage Mobile."
The Huffington Post
"Vonage has a wide range of plans to suit every customer's needs."
NextAdvisor
2014 People's Choice Stevie® Award for Favorite Customer Service in telecommunications.
Stevie Award


SEE ALL









Any entrepreneurs out there?
If you’re a small business owner, check out our business phone plans. With unlimited calling* and 40+ included business features, our customized plans are perfect to grow with your business.Read more
*Reasonable and acceptable use policy applies.









FAQs
Learn more about Vonage






How is Vonage® different from my landline phone service?






One big difference is that Vonage works over the Internet. You get everything you’d expect from a landline, plus the ability to take your home phone plan with you on your mobile—even make and receive home phone calls on up to two smartphones when you download our Vonage Extensions® app.







What type of Internet connection do I need? And is it included?






Vonage works with any high-speed Internet connection (like DSL or cable). We’re not an Internet Service Provider, so you’ll need to have your own broadband Internet service in place to use Vonage.







Can I keep my current phone number?






Yes. In most cases you can keep your current phone number. You’ll be able to check if your number can be transferred using the Keep Your Phone Number tool found in the tools module near the bottom of every plan page. If your number is transferable, we’ll help you bring it over to Vonage. And because transfers usually take about 7-10 business days, we’ll give you a temporary phone number so you can start using your Vonage service right away.







Do I need an existing phone number?






No. If you don't have an existing phone number, or don't want to transfer your current one, we’ll be happy to give you a new number when you sign up. You can even choose from available area codes and select the phone number you like best.







Will I still receive calls if my power or Internet service goes out?






Yes. Just set up your Network Availability Number when you sign up, and during an outage, all calls are forwarded to the landline or cell number you provided.





SEE ALL FAQS 









Business


Residential


Why Vonage


Mobile Apps


Vonage Home Phone





Vonage SupportSupport
Community
FAQs
911 Dialing
Retail Activation
Store Locator



About UsContact Us
Careers
Investor Relations
Vonage Corporate
Blog



International SitesCanada
United Kingdom








Find a local Vonage retailer
FIND

Sign up to receive notifications on the latest Vonage offerings
SUBMIT







fac twi pls inTo Order Call 1-800-608-5590









© 2017 Vonage
LegalPrivacy PolicyE911








¹Unlimited Calling is based on normal residential, non-commercial use. A combination of factors is used to determine abnormal use, including but not limited to: the number of unique numbers called, calls forwarded, minutes used and other factors. Subject to our Reasonable Use Policy and Terms of Service.
HIGH-SPEED INTERNET REQUIRED. VALID FOR NEW ACCOUNTS ONLY. RATES EXCLUDE INTERNET SERVICE, FEES AND TAXES. Extensions® permits inbound and outbound calling on up to two additional registered phones at the home calling plan rates. If you subscribe to plans with monthly minutes allotments (for example, U.S. & Canada 400), all call minutes placed from both your home and registered Extensions® phones will count toward your monthly minutes allotment. Extensions® calls made from mobiles use data or airtime and may incur surcharges, depending on your mobile plan. The number transfer process takes approximately 10 business days from the time you confirm your transfer request. Alarms, TTY and other systems may not be compatible. Vonage 911 service operates differently than traditional 911. See www.vonage.com/911 for details.
© 2017 Vonage











Summer Sales Event
Give your Summer a lift with a $50 Visa Gift Card†! Just sign up using promo code: SUMMERTOSAVE
Terms and restrictions apply.† Visa® Prepaid card is issued by Metabank™, member of FDIC, pursuant to a license from the Visa U.S.A. Inc.


Call for Offer:
1-800-608-5590
LEARN MORE or 				GET OFFER NOW






Call now for our Summer Savings offer:
1-800-975-0580


†Limited time offer. Valid for new customers only who are residents of the 48 contiguous United States, 18 years or older.  Cannot be combined with any other promotional offer.  Offer good while supplies last. Limited one prepaid or gift card ("Card") per household.  An eligible customer must be active and in good standing and subscribe to Vonage for two bill cycles.  After approval of eligibility, allow 5-10 business days for the Card to be issued.  Terms and conditions are applied to the Cards.  Vonage has the sole right to decide all matters and disputes arising from the Card, and all decisions are final.  All taxes on Cards are solely Customer's responsibility.  Vonage is not responsible for any damage to the Card sustained during delivery or product defects of any kind.  In the event that the Card becomes unavailable for any reason, Vonage reserves the right to provide a substitute of similar type and value. Visa prepaid card is issued by MetaBank®, Member FDIC, pursuant to a license from Visa U.S.A. Inc. 



Summer Sales Event
 Give your Summer a lift with a $50 Visa Gift Card†! Just sign up using promo code:  SUMMERTOSAVE


12-Month Promotion
$9 .99/month


Plus taxes & fees, with 1-year agreement.High-speed Internet required.
FREE activationFREE shipping
View Offer Terms

Terms and restrictions apply.† Visa® Prepaid card is issued by Metabank™, member of FDIC, pursuant to a license from the Visa U.S.A. Inc.


ORDER NOW
LEARN MORE





Summer Sales Event
Give your Summer a lift with a  $50 Visa gift card†Just sign up using promo code: SUMMERTOSAVE
$9.99/month for a full year
Terms and restrictions apply.† Visa® Prepaid card is issued by Metabank™, member of FDIC, pursuant to a license from the Visa U.S.A. Inc.View Offer Terms.
Order Now
LEARN MORE






Summer Sales Event
Give your Summer a lift with a $50 Visa Gift Card†.  Just sign up using promo code:  SUMMERTOSAVE

Terms and restrictions apply.† Visa® Prepaid card is issued by Metabank™, member of FDIC, pursuant to a license from the Visa U.S.A. Inc.
 




Get a $50 Visa Gift Card after signing up with Vonage.

Use promo code SUMMERTOSAVE
Terms and restrictions apply.† Visa® Prepaid card is issued by Metabank™, member of FDIC, pursuant to a license from the Visa U.S.A. Inc.



 

');
		document.write('');
	} else {
		novega.console.info("Omniture Suppressed");
	}
		


Support Home











Business
Residential


Support
Sign In/My Account
Español





 Forgot username 

 Forgot password 













Topics



Community Topics


Account & Billing


Technical Support


Features & Settings


General Discussion


News & Highlights







Support Topics
                                            Billing & Payment
                                            Manage Account
                                            Technical Support
                                            Features & Settings
                                            Plans & Services
                                            New Customer
                                            Support Videos

Community





Community









Vonage Personal Support

Enter a search topic






















Select a topic to view related articles, videos and interactive tools.
Billing & Payment
Manage Account
Technical Support
Features & Settings
Plans & Services



Recently signed up for Vonage Service? Click here to get started








Need help installing your Vonage Adapter?
Follow our step-by-step Installation Tool for help setting up your Vonage adapter.

Set Up Now






Ask the Community
Engage with and get answers from a passionate community of customers and Vonage experts.

Ask a Question











 Business 
 Residential 
 Why Vonage 
 Mobile Apps 
 Vonage Home Phone 




Vonage Support
Support
Community
FAQs
911 Dialing
Retail Activation
Store Locator




About Us
Contact Us
Careers
Investor Relations
Vonage Corporate
Blog




International Sites
Canada
United Kingdom









Find a Local Vonage Retailer
FIND


Sign up to receive notifications on the latest Vonage Offerings
SUBMIT








fac twi pls inTo Order Call 1-800-608-5590








© 2017 Vonage

                                        Legal
                                        
Privacy PolicyE911








¹Unlimited Calling is based on normal residential, non-commercial use. A combination of factors is used to determine abnormal use, including but not limited to: the number of unique numbers called, calls forwarded, minutes used and other factors. Subject to our Reasonable Use Policy and Terms of Service.
HIGH-SPEED INTERNET REQUIRED. VALID FOR NEW ACCOUNTS ONLY. RATES EXCLUDE INTERNET SERVICE, FEES AND TAXES. Extensions® permits inbound and outbound calling on up to two additional registered phones at the home calling plan rates. If you subscribe to plans with monthly minutes allotments (for example, U.S. & Canada 400), all call minutes placed from both your home and registered Extensions® phones will count toward your monthly minutes allotment. Extensions® calls made from mobiles use data or airtime and may incur surcharges, depending on your mobile plan. The number transfer process takes approximately 10 business days from the time you confirm your transfer request. Alarms, TTY and other systems may not be compatible. Vonage 911 service operates differently than traditional 911. See www.vonage.com/911 for details.
†Limited time offer. Valid for new customers only who are residents of the 48 contiguous United States, 18 years or older.  Cannot be combined with any other promotional offer.  Offer good while supplies last. Limited one prepaid or gift card ("Card") per household.  An eligible customer must be active and in good standing and subscribe to Vonage for two bill cycles.  After approval of eligibility, allow 5-10 business days for the Card to be issued.  Terms and conditions are applied to the Cards.  Vonage has the sole right to decide all matters and disputes arising from the Card, and all decisions are final.  All taxes on Cards are solely Customer's responsibility.  Vonage is not responsible for any damage to the Card sustained during delivery or product defects of any kind.  In the event that the Card becomes unavailable for any reason, Vonage reserves the right to provide a substitute of similar type and value. Visa prepaid card is issued by MetaBank®, Member FDIC, pursuant to a license from Visa U.S.A. Inc. 
© 2017 Vonage










Personal

Overview
Plans
Features
Mobile App
Calling Cards


Small Business 
Mid-Market & Enterprise 

Why Vonage

Overview
How Vonage Works
Customer Reviews
Awards & Reviews



Vonage Support

Support 
FAQs 
911 Dialing 
Retail Activation 
Store Locator 



About Us

Contact Us
Careers
Investor Relations
Vonage Corporate



International Sites

Canada
United Kingdom











Find a Local Vonage Retailer

FIND



Sign up to receive notifications on the latest Vonage offerings
SUBMIT







fac twi pls in








© 2016 Vonage


                                        Legal
                                        
 | Privacy Policy | E911








¹Unlimited Calling is based on normal residential, non-commercial use. A combination of factors is used to determine abnormal use, including but not limited to: the number of unique numbers called, calls forwarded, minutes used and other factors. Subject to our Reasonable Use Policy and Terms of Service.
HIGH-SPEED INTERNET REQUIRED. VALID FOR NEW ACCOUNTS ONLY. RATES EXCLUDE INTERNET SERVICE, FEES AND TAXES. Extensions® permits inbound and outbound calling on up to two additional registered phones at the home calling plan rates. If you subscribe to plans with monthly minutes allotments (for example, U.S. & Canada 400), all call minutes placed from both your home and registered Extensions® phones will count toward your monthly minutes allotment. Extensions® calls made from mobiles use data or airtime and may incur surcharges, depending on your mobile plan. The number transfer process takes approximately 10 business days from the time you confirm your transfer request. Alarms, TTY and other systems may not be compatible. Vonage 911 service operates differently than traditional 911. See www.vonage.com/911 for details.
© 2016 Vonage









Home Phone Service | Voip Calls | Voip Home | Free Phone Service





























1-800-879-8647





Home
Residential
Business
SIP Trunking
International
Features
Hardware
How VoIP Works
Agents



















24 Month Term
Home and Small Business










12 Month Term
Home and Small Business










Month to Month
Home and Small Business










$149.95 Pre-Paid
Home and Small Business



















With VoIP home phone service, you can choose any area code you like; in your own area or elsewhere in the country. Or, you can keep your current number if you prefer. VoIP calls give you that freedom. Do you already have VoIP hardware? Then check out our BYOD List to see if your device is compatible!











Brazil 2.3¢






Canada included






India 2.0¢







Italy 1.4¢






Pakistan 10.7¢





Poland 2.0¢







Portugal 1.9¢






Guatemala 12.0¢






Sweden 1.1¢







Block Lists allow you to block calls from specific
numbers with more customizable options.


Enhanced 911 transmits your address as soon as you
dial 9-1-1, even if you are unable to speak.


FailsafeTM feature can automatically forward
your calls to an alternate number in the event of an internet or power outage.


Keep Your Number, switching over or moving? No worries
with VOIP.com, you can take your number with you!




























Products
  |  Contact Us
  |  Site Map
  |  Privacy
  |  Terms
  |  PBX Terms
  |  Network Status
  |  About Us
  |  Login


©2017 VOIP.com  
Sign Up  |  800-TRY-VOIP (800-879-8647)
















	Search Engine Marketing (SEM) - Bing Ads








































































































Skip to content











Sign upSign in


 


















You run your business. We'll help find your customers.
Bing Ads can help build your business and drive your success. Spend $25 and get $100 in advertising credit.†

†Offer details




Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.







Coupon code class

First name:

Last name:

Email:

Your website URL

Business phone



*Required
Microsoft may contact you to provide updates and special offers about Bing Ads. You can unsubscribe at any time. To learn more you can read the privacy statement.
Type the code from the image:

Enter security code:







             























×
Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.


†Offer Details: Offer expires December 31, 2017.  Valid only for new Bing Ads customers who are first party recipients of the offer email. A new Bing Ads customer is one that has not advertised on Bing Ads before. Enter promotional coupon code and spend $25 (applies to threshold and prepaid accounts) to receive $100 in Bing Ads credits. Limit one promotion code per new Bing Ads customer. Promotional code must be redeemed within thirty (30) days of Bing Ads new customer account creation. Ad campaign costs accrued before receiving a credit, as well as costs accrued after all credits are used, will be charged to the payment method associated with the Bing Ads account. If customer payment fails, the coupon amount will not be applied.  Ads will continue to run and accrue costs after any promotional credit has been used up. Any portion of the credit not used within ninety (90) days of credit redemption will expire and can't be carried over even if the Bing Ads Customer switches their payment method. Offer valid only to residents of the United States. In order for the offer to be valid, a form of payment must be entered into your account prior to redemption of the promotional code and prior to your account going live to take advantage of the credit. This offer may not be combined with any other offer, promotional code coupon or discount, separated, redeemed for cash, transferred, sold, or bartered. Microsoft, in its sole discretion, can close your account for any suspected coupon abuse. Refund of the $25 is not permitted.  See Bing Ads Terms and Conditions for more details at sign-up. Other terms and conditions may apply.  Microsoft reserves the right to cancel, change, or suspend this offer at any time without notice.









See how Bing Ads works



Customers search


Customers see your ad


Customers contact you


Watch how Bing Ads works  
 








×
How Bing Ads works

















Help more customers find you
See how Bing can attract customers your Google AdWords campaigns can't.

Reach 137 million searchers on the Bing Network.1
Tap into 32.9% of the search marketplace.2
Get in front of searchers who spend 16 percent more than the average internet searcher.2











Powerful network. Powerful benefits.



Reach across devicesConnect with customers looking for your business anytime, anywhere, on any device.


Go global or localReach people in the Bing Network everywhere or focus on cities, counties and areas within a certain distance from your business.


Easy to importIf you're already using another product like Google Adwords, it's easy to pull that campaign into Bing Ads.








You control your costs

 Free sign-upJoin Bing Ads for free and control your account at every step.


 Only pay for clicksPay just when customers click on your ad. No click, no charge.


 No minimum feeStart advertising with a budget that works best for your business.









 



The advantage we gain in cost per click gives us a great return on investment — more than 35 percent better than Google AdWords.
Scott Redgate, search engine marketing manager — CJ Pony Parts
By using Bing Ads features like Image Extensions and Sitelink Extensions, this auto parts retailer races to convert customers and beat its competition.

 Read about driving more conversions







 



We might not get as much of the volume as with Google AdWords, but the volume of the traffic that we get converts really well at a lower cost.
Scott Schult, Executive Vice President of Marketing — Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau
The Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau uses Bing Ads to drive site traffic and tourism at lower cost.

 Read about getting better ROI








Better results for less cost. That's as simple as I can make it. If I look at the quality of the traffic we get for the dollars we spend on Bing Ads, our ROI is fantastic.
Alex Littlewood, CEO   Motoroso
Motoroso, a market network for auto enthusiasts, gets better results for less cost and reaches a high-value audience with Bing Ads.

 Read about attracting quality traffic



 









Import your AdWords campaigns

Save time by importing your Google AdWords campaigns into Bing Ads to get ads live quickly.


Sign in with your Microsoft account (or create one) to get started on Bing Ads.


From within the Bing Ads interface, select the Import from Google AdWords option.


Enter your Google AdWords credentials and select the campaign you want to import.










Preview your ad

Get found online with search engine marketing. Make the most of your marketing dollars and drive customers to your business.
See how Bing Ads can work for you




















Get started today
Give us a few details about your business to create a Bing Ads account and get it up and running.


  
Sign up
Get started with Bing Ads 
Signing up is always free.













FAQ


Is Bing Ads right for me?

Is Bing Ads right for my business?
All types of businesses find value and success with Bing Ads. Whether you're focused on local calls and foot traffic, or want to drive traffic to your website from across the country or around the world. Bing Ads has solutions for you.
I already appear in search results for free. Why should I pay for advertising?
Your current customers may search for your business by name, aiming it easy to find you in search results. But customers you've yet to reach are more likely searching for general terms that wouldn't necessarily bring up your business in search results. Advertising next to relevant Bing search results puts your business front and center with interested customers you otherwise might not reach.
What is the difference between SEO and SEM? Which one is right for me?
Search engine optimization (SEO) is adjusting your website to improve your natural ranking in search results. You cannot pay to improve your website ranking on Bing or Yahoo, thus we often refer to these results and unpaid or "organic" search results.

	Clicks from SEO are free. But SEO also requires technical expertise and involves some factors over which you have only limited control.

	Search engine marketing (SEM) is paid advertising that appears next to or above unpaid (or "organic") search results. These paid ads are purchased through Bing Ads.

	You pay for SEM clicks. But SEM gives you more control over when your website appears on results pages and you decide how much you want to pay. And you can measure which ads are working and quickly improve your results.

	You don't have to choose between SEO and SEM. You can do both!
If my time is limited, should I still try Bing ads?
Yes! Call a Bing Ads specialist at 877-635-3561*and we’ll set up your first campaign for you for free. We’ll give you tips on getting the most out of your ads and set you up for success. We’re here to help.




About Bing Ads

Where does my ad appear?
Your ads could appear on the top or to the right of Bing, Yahoo, and MSN search results. And you can choose to target your ads to different geographic regions, times or days of the week, and even demographics.
What determines my ad position?
Bing Ads is a pay-per-click (PPC) advertising system. You bid based on how much you are willing to pay per each click on your ad. Because webpages have a limited number of places to show ads, we auction those spaces. You are bidding against other advertisers to get your ads into the space you want. So if you bid on the keyword "shoe", you will have to beat the bids of the other advertisers who are also bidding on "shoe." You determine how much you are willing to bid.
	Your ad position is based on several things, including:
	
How closely your ad and website fit with the terms that are searched (relevance).
How your bid compares to other bids in the Bing Ads auction.
How strongly your ad has performed in the past and how often it has been clicked (click-through rate).

	The stronger you are in these areas, the better your chances of winning the top ad position.




How to use Bing Ads

How can I use Bing Ads to drive more people to my website?
Here are some tips to get better results:
	
Review your budget and bid strategy. If your ad keeps pausing, your budget limit may be set too low. Competitive bids help your ad stay in a strong position to catch eyes and get more clicks to your website.
Expand your targeting, both for location and for devices (computer, mobile and tablet).
Make sure your ads and website are relevant to the keywords you bid on. Would someone searching your terms expect to see and ad for your business?


How can I keep my costs down?
While your first instinct may be to lower your budget, first try lowering your maximum bids. Yes, this could mean fewer customers visit your site. But if you increase your quality score and build ads with a strong performance history, you may be able to win a good ad position with a lower bid. That would lower your cost=per-click and help stretch your budget.
How do I know if Bing Ads is working?
View a wide range of performance trends in your account to quickly see key stats: ad clicks, the number of times your ad appeared (impressions), spend, average cost-per-click, click-through rate, average ad position, cost per acquisition, and conversions. You can also run performance reports to get insights into how well your campaigns are doing.
Can I run more than one ad?
Yes! In fact, we encourage it. Only one ad will show at a time but running multiple ads lets you test different approaches to see what's working best with your target customers. Frequently, businesses try out different ads for specific products or pages.




Getting started with Bing Ads

How do I get started?
Sign up for Bing Ads
Which keywords should I choose?
You have a few options to help choose your keywords. First you'll want to think of the terms one of your customers might use to search for your products and offerings. Those search terms are a great starting point. Then you can use tools right in your account to find more keywords. Within Bing Ads, click Campaigns on the top of the page. Click the Keywords tab, and then click Add Keywords. This will let you:
	
Search for new keywords based on one you enter.
Search a website for keywords.
Search your destination URLs for keywords.


How can I write a good ad?
Here are a few tips that can help make your ad stand out.
	
Keep your ads relevant. One way to improve relevance is to use your customer's most popular search terms in your ad titles and txt.
Describe what sets your product apart.
Use your customers' language. Use words and writing tone that are likely to attract your typical customer.
Be specific. This clearer and more specific your offering, the better. For example, rather than "big discount," specify and exact percentage, such as "50 percent off."
Give customers a reason to click your ad right now. Offer a specific call to action, such as encouraging customers to request a brochure or consultation, download a free e-book, subscribe to a newsletter, or take advantage of a limited-time discount.























Sign up with Bing Ads to get started





































